Maine, session 132, LD906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3473, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 307, §4, is
amended to read:
1-A. Reporting. By January 1st February 10th of each year, the commission shall
provide a summary report of its findings under subsection 1 to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters.
Page 1 - 132LR0551(02)